Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.330

Violation of chapter—Misdemeanor.

Any person violating any provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1989 c 380 s 26; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 33.]